Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. On August 2, 2024, the governor declared a state of emergency in all counties due to threats to life and property from existing and threatened wildfires.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESâFIRES. The sum of $77,687,000 is appropriated from the budget stabilization account for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, and is provided solely for fire suppression costs incurred by the department of natural resources during the 2024 fire season. For purposes of RCW 43.88.055(4), the appropriation in this section does not alter the requirement to balance in ensuing biennia.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---